Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 650.120 is amended to read:
650.120. For the purposes of ORS 650.120 to 650.170:
(1) “Dealer”  means any person [ who] that has been issued a vehicle dealer certificate under
ORS 822.020 and pursuant to a franchise from a manufacturer, distributor or importer  engages in
buying, selling, leasing or exchanging new motor vehicles.
(2) “Dealership” means the location  from which a dealer buys, sells, leases, trades, stores, takes
on consignment or in any other manner deals in new motor vehicles.
(3) “Distributor” means :
(a) A person [ who] that sells or  distributes motor vehicles other than motor homes to motor
vehicle dealers[ .]; and
(b) A  subsidiary, affiliate, branch or division of a person described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(4) “Fleet owner” means a person in this state [ who] that  at one time buys or leases  for use in
a business:
(a) 15 or more motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 8,500 pounds; or
(b) 50 or more vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or more.
(5) “Franchise” means a contract or agreement under which:
(a) The franchisee is granted the right to  sell, lease and exchange new motor vehicles manu-
factured, distributed or imported by the franchisor;
(b) The franchisee’s business is an independent business operating as a  component of a distrib-
ution or marketing system prescribed in substantial part by the franchisor;
(c) The franchisee’s business is substantially associated with the trademark, trade  name, com-
mercial symbol or advertisements designating the franchisor or  the products distributed by the
franchisor;
(d) The franchisee’s  business is substantially reliant on the franchisor for a continued supply
of motor vehicles, parts and accessories;
(e) The franchisee is granted the right to  perform warranty repairs authorized by the franchisor;
and
(f) The franchisee is  granted the right to sell, install and exchange parts, equipment and acces-
sories manufactured, distributed or imported by the franchisor for use in or on motor vehicles.
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 1
(6) “Franchisee” means a dealer [ to whom a franchise ] that is granted  a franchise .
(7) “Franchisor” means a manufacturer, distributor or  importer [ who] that grants a franchise
to a dealer.
(8) “Importer”  means a person [ who] that transports or arranges for the transportation of any
foreign manufactured new motor vehicle into the United States for sale in this state.
(9) “Manufacturer” means :
(a) A person [ who] that:
(A) Manufactures or assembles  motor vehicles [ or who manufactures or installs on previously
assembled truck chassis  special bodies or equipment, other than motor homes, that when installed forms
an integral part of the motor vehicle and constitutes a major manufacturing alteration and which
completed unit is owned by the manufacturer. ]; or
(B) Manufactures or installs a  special body or equipment on a previously assembled truck
chassis, the combination of which is a major manufacturing alteration  of the previously as-
sembled truck chassis and forms  an integrated motor vehicle, other than a motor home, that
the person owns; and
(b) A  subsidiary, affiliate, branch or division of a person described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(10) “Manufacturer’s suggested retail price” means the retail price  of the new motor vehicle
suggested by the manufacturer, including the retail  delivered price suggested by the manufacturer
for each accessory or item  of optional equipment physically attached to the new motor vehicle at
the time of delivery to the dealer that is not  included within the retail price suggested by the
manufacturer for the new motor vehicle without the accessory or optional equipment.
(11) “Motor home” means a motor  vehicle that is designed to provide temporary living
quarters, [ and] that  is built into an integral part of, or is permanently attached to, a self-propelled
motor vehicle chassis  or van[ . The vehicle must contain ] and that has  permanently installed inde-
pendent life support systems [ and] that  provide at least four of the following facilities:
(a) Cooking;
(b) Refrigeration or  an ice box;
(c) A self-contained toilet;
(d) Heating or air conditioning;
(e) A potable water supply system including a faucet and sink; or
(f) A separate 110-120 volt electrical power supply or liquefied petroleum gas supply.
(12) “Motor vehicle” means:
(a) A self-propelled device, other than a motor home, used:
(A) For transportation of persons or property upon a public highway; or
(B) In construction; or
(b) A trailer with a gross vehicle weight rating of 20,000 pounds or  more that is used for com-
mercial transportation on a public highway.
(13) “Predecessor in interest” means a manufacturer,  distributor or importer that transferred to
another manufacturer, distributor or importer,  whether through sale or other means, the right to
manufacture, distribute or import motor vehicles using  the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or
importer’s trademark, service mark, trade name, logotype or other commercial symbol.
(14) “Qualified vendor” means  a person with a contract or agreement to sell goods or services
to a manufacturer, distributor or importer.
(15) “Relevant market area” means:
(a) For a dealer primarily of motor vehicles with a gross vehicle  weight rating of less than 8,500
pounds, a circular area around an existing dealership of:
(A) Not less than a 10-mile radius from the dealership site;
(B) Not less than a 15-mile radius from the dealership site if the population  is less than 250,000
within a 10-mile radius  from the existing dealership and 150,000 or more within a 15-mile radius from
the existing dealership;
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 2
(C) Not less than a 20-mile radius from the dealership site if the population  is less than 150,000
within a 15-mile radius from the existing dealership; or
(D) The area of sales and service responsibility determined under the franchise agreement if  the
area is larger than the areas provided for in this paragraph.
(b) For a dealer primarily of motor vehicles with  a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds
or more, a circular area around an existing dealership of:
(A) Not less than a 25-mile radius from the dealership site; or
(B) The  area of sales and service responsibility determined under the franchise agreement if the
area is larger than the area provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(16) “Replacement  dealer” means any person [ who] that, at a dealership where the former dealer
was franchised by the same manufacturer, distributor or importer, or the  manufacturer’s,
distributor’s or importer’s  predecessor in interest, has been issued a vehicle dealer certificate under
ORS 822.020 and pursuant to  a franchise from a manufacturer, distributor or importer, or the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s predecessor in interest,  engages in buying, selling, leasing
or exchanging new motor vehicles.
(17) “Site-control agreement” means an agreement between  a franchisor and franchisee pursuant
to which the franchisor would:
(a) Control the use and development of a dealership site other than as permitted in ORS 650.120
to 650.170;
(b) Require a franchisee to establish or maintain an exclusive dealership  under a franchise
agreement with the franchisor by not  investing in, managing or sharing another dealership with a
different franchisor; or
(c) Restrict the ability of a franchisee, or if the franchisee leases the dealership, the ability  of
the franchisee’s lessor, to transfer, assign, sell, lease, develop or change the  use of the dealership
site.
(18) “Successor in interest” means a manufacturer, distributor or importer that acquires,
whether through purchase, transfer or other  means, the right to manufacture, distribute or import
motor vehicles using the trademark, service mark, trade name, logotype or other  commercial symbol
of another manufacturer, distributor or importer.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 650.130 is amended to read:
650.130. Notwithstanding  the terms of any franchise or other agreement, a manufacturer, dis-
tributor or importer may not:
(1) Require or attempt to require a dealer to accept  delivery of any motor vehicle, part, acces-
sory or any other commodity that the dealer did not voluntarily order. This  subsection does not
apply to recall safety and emissions campaign parts that the dealer  did not voluntarily order or to
any vehicle features, parts, accessories or other components mandated by  federal, state or local law.
(2) Coerce  or attempt to coerce a dealer to enter into any agreement or sales promotion pro-
gram by threatening to cancel the dealer’s franchise.
(3) Refuse or fail to deliver, within a reasonable time and in a  reasonable quantity, any new
motor vehicle, part or  accessory covered by the franchise if the manufacturer, distributor or
importer advertises  the vehicle, part or accessory as available for delivery or is delivering the ve-
hicle, part or accessory to  another dealer. This subsection does not apply if the failure to deliver
results from a cause beyond the control of the manufacturer, distributor or importer.
(4) Prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from making reasonable changes in a  dealership’s
capital structure or the means by which a dealer finances the dealership, provided that the dealer
meets any reasonable capital requirement of the manufacturer, distributor or importer.
(5) Unreasonably refuse to compensate a dealer for work or services the dealer performed  and
expenses the dealer incurred in accordance  with the dealer’s delivery, preparation and warranty
obligations under the terms of a franchise or agreement.
(6) Coerce or attempt to coerce  a dealer to participate monetarily in any advertising campaign
or contest, or to purchase any promotional materials, display devices or  display decorations or ma-
terials at the dealer’s expense.
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 3
(7) Establish a maximum price a dealer may charge for motor vehicles with a gross vehicle
weight rating of less than 8,500 pounds.
(8) Initiate an audit to determine the  validity of paid claims for dealer compensation, or for any
charge-backs for warranty parts , [ or] service compensation  or consumer or dealer incentives ,
more than one year following the date of payment unless  the manufacturer, distributor or importer
has reasonable grounds  to believe that the dealer submitted a fraudulent claim. If a manufacturer,
distributor or importer initiates an audit more than one year following the  date of payment, the
manufacturer, distributor or importer  may charge back to the dealer only the amount of a claim that
the manufacturer, distributor or importer  proves was fraudulent. Parties shall cooperate to ensure
that permitted audits conclude not more than 60 days after the audits begin.
[(9) Initiate an audit to determine the validity of paid claims for dealer compensation,  or for any
charge-backs for consumer or dealer incentives, more than  one year following the date of payment un-
less the manufacturer, distributor or importer has reasonable grounds to believe that the dealer sub-
mitted a fraudulent claim. If a manufacturer, distributor or importer  initiates an audit more than one
year following the date of payment, the manufacturer, distributor or importer may charge back to the
dealer only the amount of a claim  that the manufacturer, distributor or importer proves was fraudulent.
Parties shall cooperate to ensure  that permitted audits conclude not more than 60 days after the audits
begin.]
[(10)] (9) Unfairly compete with a dealer in any matters the franchise governs including,  but not
limited to, the sale or allocation  of vehicles or other franchisor products, or the execution of dealer
programs or benefits. This subsection  applies if the manufacturer, distributor or importer has an
ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or indirectly, a business  that is a dealer in this
state.
(10) Implement or modify a system for selling or leasing motor vehicles that does not:
(a) Use customer dealer selection or other objective criteria to allocate the motor vehi-
cles, if the manufacturer, distributor or importer designs or controls the system; and
(b) Make available to dealers a description of the rules  and requirements for making
reservations through the system, or changes to the rules and  requirements, at least 30 days
before implementing the system or making the change.
(11) Have an ownership  interest in, operate or control, directly or indirectly, a business that
sells or leases a motor vehicle to a person in [ Oregon] this state  except to a franchisee of the
manufacturer, distributor or importer. A manufacturer, distributor or importer does not violate  this
subsection  if:
(a) The manufacturer, distributor or importer:
(A) Has an ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or indirectly, a business that  is
a dealership in this state and is a business that:
(i) A franchisee owned, operated or controlled  before the manufacturer, distributor or importer
acquired the ownership interest in or began to operate or control the business;
(ii) The manufacturer, distributor or importer maintains an ownership  interest in, operates or
controls for no more than two years; and
(iii) The manufacturer, distributor or importer offers for sale to a  qualified independent person
at a fair and reasonable price while  the manufacturer, distributor or importer maintains an owner-
ship interest in, operates or controls the business.
(B) Has a part ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or indirectly, a business that
is a dealership in this state and another person:
(i) Manages the day-to-day operations and business of the dealership;
(ii) Has made, or  is obligated to make within 12 months, a significant capital investment in the
dealership that is subject to loss;
(iii) Has an ownership interest in the dealership; and
(iv) Operates the dealership under a franchise through which  the person will within 15 years
acquire full ownership of the dealership under reasonable terms and conditions.
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 4
(C) As of January 1, 2000, had an ownership interest in, operated or controlled, directly or in-
directly, a business that is  a dealership in this state that sells motor vehicles with a gross vehicle
weight rating of 8,500 pounds or more.
(D) Has an ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or  indirectly, a business that
primarily leases or rents motor vehicles for a period of 12 months or  less and the only motor vehi-
cles that the business sells are motor vehicles that have been:
(i) Owned by the business for 180 days or more; or
(ii) Driven more than 10,000 miles while owned by the business.
(E)(i) Has an ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or  indirectly, a business that
finances the sale or lease of motor vehicles; and
(ii) Is a business that sells or leases motor vehicles to retail lessees in [ Oregon] this state .
(F) Has an ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or indirectly, a business that
makes a sale or lease of a  motor vehicle in a manner that does not violate subsection (12) of this
section.
(b) A manufacturer  has a part ownership interest in, operates or controls, directly or indirectly,
a business that  is a dealership in this state that buys, sells, leases, trades, stores, takes on
consignment or in any other manner deals  exclusively in a single line-make of the manufacturer and:
(A) The manufacturer has, directly or indirectly, no more than 45 percent of  the ownership in-
terest in the dealership;
(B) When the manufacturer acquires an ownership interest in  the dealership, the distance from
the manufacturer’s dealership to the dealership of  a dealer that buys, sells, leases, trades, stores,
takes on consignment or in any other manner  deals in the single line-make of the manufacturer and
in which the manufacturer has no ownership interest is not less than 15 miles;
(C) The manufacturer complies with the area restrictions in ORS 650.120 and 650.150;
(D) The manufacturer’s franchises authorize a dealer of the manufacturer’s  single line-make to
operate  as  many dealerships within a defined geographic area as the dealer and manufacturer agree
on; and
(E) On January 1, 2000:
(i) There were no more than four dealers of the manufacturer’s single line-make in this state;
and
(ii) Of the dealers of  the manufacturer’s single line-make in this state, at least one was a
franchisee that owned and operated  at least two dealerships within the geographic area authorized
by franchises with the manufacturer.
(12) Sell or lease a motor vehicle to  a person in this state other than to a business described
in subsection (11) of this section or to a franchisee of  the manufacturer, distributor or importer. A
manufacturer, distributor or importer does not violate this subsection if:
(a) The manufacturer, distributor or importer sells or leases a motor vehicle to:
(A) An employee, retired employee or family member of an employee or retired  employee of the
manufacturer, distributor or importer;
(B) A driver training program;
(C) A nonprofit corporation;
(D) A qualified vendor;
(E) A public agency, as defined in ORS 537.515;
(F) A current retail lessee;
(G) A fleet owner;
(H) A business acting as a vehicle dealer under ORS chapter 822 that sells motor  vehicles only
to other vehicle dealers; or
(I) The customers of a business acting as a vehicle dealer  under ORS chapter 822 that sells
motor vehicles only to other vehicle dealers.
(b) The sale or lease is by a business in this state that primarily leases  or rents motor vehicles
for a period of 12 months or less and the only  motor vehicles that the business sells are motor ve-
hicles that have been:
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 5
(A) Owned by the business for 180 days or more; or
(B) Driven more than 10,000 miles while owned by the business.
(c) The sale or lease is by a subsidiary of a manufacturer, distributor or importer that finances
the sale or lease of motor vehicles and  the sale or lease is to a person that previously leased the
vehicle from the subsidiary.
(13)(a) Own, operate or control a business or enter into  any contract, agreement or other writ-
ten instrument that permits the manufacturer, distributor or importer to compensate a  person that
is not a dealer for performing warranty repairs and services if the business is located within  a
dealer’s relevant market area.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to:
(A) Warranty repairs and services  performed on motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of less than 8,500 pounds provided for commercial or government fleets; or
(B) Warranty repairs and services performed on motor  vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of 8,500 pounds or more if, after January 1, 2002, a  manufacturer, distributor or importer of
only motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or more has:
(i) Obtained written permission from the dealers in the relevant market area to perform the re-
pairs or services; or
(ii) Authorized a person that owns or leases the motor vehicles for use in the  person’s business
to perform the repairs or services.
(14) Terminate, cancel, fail to renew or fail to approve the sale, transfer or assignment  of any
franchise agreement because the  dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the management
of or holds a  franchise agreement with another manufacturer, distributor or importer at a different
dealership site, or has franchises with more than one manufacturer, distributor or importer sharing
the same dealership site, facilities, personnel or display space before October 23, 1999.
(15) Terminate, cancel, fail to renew or fail to approve the sale, transfer or assignment  of any
franchise agreement because the  dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the management
of or holds a  franchise agreement with another manufacturer, distributor or importer at a different
dealership site, or has franchises with more than one manufacturer, distributor or importer sharing
the same dealership site, facilities, personnel or display space on or after January  1, 2012, provided
the dealer complies  with the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s reasonable capitalization and
financial requirements, reasonable space and  facility requirements and other requirements that are
justified taking into account  the reasonable business considerations of the manufacturer, distributor
or importer and the dealer, and provided there is no change in the principal management of the
dealership site.
(16)(a) Require a prospective franchisee to  enter into a site-control agreement as a condition of:
(A) Granting or renewing a franchise;
(B) Approving the addition of a line-make of a manufacturer;
(C) Approving the sale, transfer or assignment of a franchise agreement;
(D) Approving the relocation, or granting  a new franchise for relocation, of an existing dealer-
ship; or
(E) Obtaining fair and reasonable compensation under ORS  650.145 upon the termination, can-
cellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance of any franchise.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not prohibit enforcement of a voluntary  agreement
between a franchisee and a manufacturer,  distributor or importer for which separate and valuable
consideration that does not include any of the items  listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection has
been offered and accepted.
(17) Take any adverse action against a dealer for  violating a prohibition that the manufacturer,
distributor or importer imposes on the dealer’s exporting a  motor vehicle or selling a motor vehicle
for resale because the dealer  sold a motor vehicle to a customer that exported or resold the motor
vehicle in violation  of the prohibition, unless the manufacturer, distributor or importer provided the
dealer with written notice of the prohibition and the  dealer knew or reasonably should have known
at the time the dealer sold the motor vehicle to the customer that the customer intended  to export
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 6
or resell the vehicle in  violation of the prohibition. A dealer that registers or causes a motor vehicle
to be registered in this state or another  state and that collects or causes to be collected any sales
or use  tax required in this state establishes a rebuttable presumption that the dealer did not have
reason to know that the customer intended to export or resell the motor vehicle.
(18)(a) Charge a fee to a consumer to sell, lease, provide, update or finance or offer to
sell, lease, provide, update or finance, except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) A subscription service that uses  components and hardware that are already installed
on a motor vehicle,  and that would operate after activation without ongoing cost or support,
in exchange for a recurring payment, other than a payment for a lease or under a  retail in-
stallment contract, as defined in ORS 83.510, from a retail customer; or
(B) A convenience or safety function,  such as heated seats or driver assistance, in return
for a payment from a retail customer.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this  subsection does not prohibit a manufacturer, distributor or
importer from:
(A) Charging a fee to a consumer to sell, lease, provide, update or finance or  offering to
sell, lease, provide,  update or finance a motor vehicle or a product, service or financing
through a dealer;
(B) Providing a motor vehicle, product or service for occasional promotional or charitable
purposes;
(C) Arranging or providing emergency roadside service; or
(D) Offering or providing a free trial of a subscription service described  in paragraph
(a)(A) of this subsection.
(c) This subsection does not apply to:
(A) Any electronic wireless communication system installed in a motor vehicle; or
(B) An information or entertainment service, navigation  system, satellite radio, roadside
assistance or other  driver assistance, or automation features that rely on cellular networks
or other data networks for operation.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 650.132 is amended to read:
650.132. (1)(a) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may not, through any of the methods  de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, directly or indirectly coerce or attempt to coerce a
dealer to:
(A) Advertise, promote, offer or sell an extended service contract, an extended maintenance
plan, a guaranteed asset protection waiver or other arrangement that pays a  purchaser the re-
maining balance on a note secured by a  motor vehicle if the motor vehicle is lost, stolen or damaged
beyond repair, or  a similar product or service, if the manufacturer, distributor or importer provides,
originates, sponsors or endorses the product or service[ .];
(B) Install on the dealer’s premises an electric vehicle charging station for the  primary
purpose of allowing the public to charge electric vehicles; or
(C) Accept a new plan  or system for allocating or scheduling a delivery of a motor vehi-
cle, part or accessory, or a modification to an existing plan or system,  if the new or modified
plan or system is not fair, reasonable and equitable for all dealers  of the manufacturer’s,
distributor’s or importer’s line-make.
(b) Prohibited methods for coercing or attempting to coerce a dealer  include, but are not limited
to:
(A) Stating to a dealer that the dealer’s failure to advertise, promote, offer or sell the products
or services described in paragraph (a) (A) of  this subsection will substantially and adversely affect
the dealer’s business or the dealer’s relationship with the manufacturer, distributor or importer;
(B) Requiring  the dealer in a franchise agreement to advertise, promote, offer or sell the pro-
ducts or services  described in paragraph (a) (A) of this subsection , install the electric vehicle
charging station described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection or  accept the plan or sys-
tem described in paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection ;
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 7
(C) Measuring the dealer’s performance in a franchise on the basis of whether,  or the extent to
which, the dealer advertises, promotes, offers or sells the products or services  described in para-
graph (a) (A) of this subsection , installs the electric vehicle charging station described in para-
graph (a)(B) of this subsection or  accepts the plan or system described in paragraph (a)(C)
of this subsection ; [ or]
(D) Requiring  the dealer to advertise, promote, offer or sell the products or services described
in paragraph (a) (A) of this subsection to the exclusion of other, similar products  or services that a
person other than the manufacturer, distributor or importer offers[ .];
(E) Using force or a threat of force;
(F) Withholding or threatening to withhold motor vehicles or parts from  the dealer, or
offering or providing motor vehicles or parts to the dealer at a price  that is higher than the
price that the manufacturer, distributor or importer offers or provides to  other dealers of
the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s line-make; or
(G) Refusing to offer to the dealer or to allow the dealer to earn incentives on the same
terms that  the manufacturer, distributor or importer offers or provides to other dealers of
the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s line-make.
(2) The prohibition in  subsection (1) of this section does not affect a manufacturer’s, distributor’s
or importer’s right or ability to:
(a) Provide incentives to a dealer that voluntarily decides  to advertise, promote, offer or sell the
products or services described in subsection (1)(a) (A) of  this section  or to install the electric ve-
hicle charging station described in subsection (1)(a)(B) of this section ; or
(b) Require a dealer that sells a product or  service that is similar to the products or services
described in subsection (1)(a) (A) of this section, but that the manufacturer, distributor or importer
does not provide, originate, sponsor or endorse,  to notify a customer in writing, and to obtain the
customer’s acknowledgment, that the manufacturer, distributor or importer does not provide, origi-
nate, sponsor or endorse the product or service.
(3) A  manufacturer, distributor or importer is not coercing a dealer if the manufacturer,
distributor or importer requires the  dealer to comply with reasonably necessary standards
to fulfill the dealer’s sales and service obligations.
(4) At a dealer’s written  request, a manufacturer, distributor or importer shall describe
in writing the basis for allocating or scheduling for delivery a motor vehicle, part  or acces-
sory among all the dealers of the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s line-make.
(5) A manufacturer,  distributor or importer need not pay or make available incentives
or other benefits to a dealer that has not qualified for the incentives or benefits  on the same
terms that the manufacturer, distributor or importer applies uniformly and equitably to all
of the dealers of the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s line-make.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 650.133 is amended to read:
650.133. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, a manufacturer, distributor
or importer may not require a dealer to construct a new dealer facility or materially alter or re-
model an existing dealer facility within seven years after  the date on which the dealer previously
constructed, materially altered or remodeled the  existing dealer facility if the existing dealer facility
complies with the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or  importer’s approved brand image standards or
plans that existed at the time  the dealer constructed, materially altered or remodeled the existing
dealer facility.
(b) A manufacturer, distributor  or importer may require a dealer to construct a new dealer fa-
cility or materially alter  or remodel an existing dealer facility within seven years after the dealer
constructed, materially altered or remodeled the existing dealer facility:
(A) If the manufacturer, distributor or importer demonstrates that the  manufacturer’s,
distributor’s or importer’s requirement is reasonable and justifiable in light of:
(i) The projected cost of the construction, material alteration or remodel;
(ii) Existing and reasonably foreseeable economic conditions;
(iii) Financial expectations;
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 8
(iv) The availability of additional vehicle allocation; and
(v) The dealer’s market for vehicle sales;
(B) In order to comply with a health or safety law or with  a technological requirement that is
necessary to sell or service a motor vehicle that the dealer sells or services  under the terms of the
dealer’s franchise; or
(C) By means of a written  agreement separate from the franchise agreement if the manufacturer,
distributor or importer provides money,  credit, an allowance, an incentive or a reimbursement to the
dealer to compensate for all or a substantial  portion of the cost of constructing a new dealer facility
or materially altering or remodeling an existing dealer facility.
(c) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not prohibit a dealer from voluntarily agreeing  with a
manufacturer, distributor or importer to construct  a new dealer facility or materially alter or re-
model an existing dealer facility in return for separate and valuable consideration. For the  purposes
of this paragraph, renewing a dealer’s franchise is not separate and valuable consideration.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Materially alter” means a significant architectural or structural modification to a  dealer
facility that is directly related to effectively selling or servicing  motor vehicles of the type that the
dealer’s franchise agreement or license permits the dealer to sell or service.
(B) “Materially alter” does not include routine maintenance, such as interior painting,  that is
reasonably necessary to keep a dealer facility in attractive condition.
(2)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a manufacturer, distributor or
importer may not require a dealer to purchase goods or services for constructing, materially altering
or remodeling a dealer facility  from a vendor that the manufacturer, distributor or importer selects,
identifies or designates without giving the dealer an option to obtain goods or  services of substan-
tially similar quality and design from a vendor that the  dealer chooses, subject to the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s  written  approval in advance. The manufacturer, distrib-
utor or importer may not withhold  approval unreasonably[ .] and must approve or disapprove
within 20 business days after a  dealer’s written request to purchase goods and services from
a source other than  a source the manufacturer, distributor or importer selects, identifies
or designates. If the manufacturer, distributor or  importer does not disapprove the dealer’s
request in writing within 20  business days after receiving the request, the request is ap-
proved.
(b) A dealer may not select a vendor from  which to obtain goods and services for constructing
a new dealer facility or materially altering or remodeling an existing dealer  facility if a manufac-
turer, distributor  or importer provides money, credit, an allowance or a reimbursement to compen-
sate for all or a substantial portion of the cost of upgrading or improving a dealer facility or  for
using a specific material, good or service to upgrade or improve a dealer facility.
(c) This subsection does not permit a dealer or vendor to:
(A) Directly or indirectly or in any way infringe upon, eliminate or impair a  manufacturer’s,
distributor’s or importer’s intellectual property rights or reasonable business requirements; or
(B) Erect or maintain signs that do not conform to the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s
intellectual property usage guidelines.
(3) A manufacturer, distributor or importer has the burden of proof in a dispute with  a
dealer over whether:
(a) A requirement the manufacturer, distributor or importer  imposes under subsection
(1)(b) of this section is  reasonable and justifiable or is necessary to comply with a health or
safety law or technological requirement; or
(b) A disapproval of a request to purchase goods  or services under subsection (2)(a) of
this section was reasonable.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 650.158 is amended to read:
650.158. (1) Each manufacturer,  distributor or importer shall specify in writing to each of the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s dealers in this state:
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 9
(a) The dealer’s obligations for predelivery preparation  and warranty service on the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s motor vehicles;
(b) The schedule of compensation the manufacturer, distributor or  importer will pay the dealer
for [ parts, work and service ] diagnostic work, repair service, parts and  labor in connection with
predelivery preparation and warranty service; and
(c) The time allowances for performing predelivery preparation and warranty service.
(2)(a) A schedule of compensation must include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work,
repair service , parts  and labor  and must  reasonably, adequately and fairly compensate the
dealer for the work, service, parts  and labor . Time allowances for diagnosing and performing
predelivery and warranty service must be reasonable and adequate for the work to be  performed.
A manufacturer, distributor or importer may not pay an hourly rate to a dealer that  is less than the
rate the dealer charges nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty  service and repairs. Reimburse-
ment for parts, other than parts used to repair the  living facilities of motor homes, that the dealer
purchases for use in performing predelivery and warranty  service must be the amount the dealer
charges nonwarranty customers, as long as the amount is not unreasonable.
(b)(A) For purposes of this subsection and subject to subparagraphs (B) [ and (C) ] to (D)  of this
paragraph, to determine compensation under this subsection, a dealer shall propose an  hourly rate
and an amount for parts that the dealer charges nonwarranty  customers by submitting to the man-
ufacturer, distributor or  importer copies of 100 sequential nonwarranty service repair invoices that
customers paid or 90 consecutive days’ worth of nonwarranty service  invoices that customers paid,
whichever is less, for repairs  the dealer made not more than 180 days before the dealer’s submission.
If the manufacturer,  distributor or importer does not contest the dealer’s proposal and the dealer
otherwise complies with the provisions of this paragraph, the dealer’s proposal  is presumed to be
fair and reasonable.
(B) A manufacturer,  distributor or importer may contest the dealer’s proposal with evidence that
the dealer’s  proposal is not accurate or on the basis that the dealer’s proposal does not reasonably
conform with the hourly rate or  the amount for parts that other dealers charge nonwarranty cus-
tomers in the  same line-make in market areas that are contiguous to the dealer’s market area or
with other relevant evidence. In contesting a dealer’s proposal based  on evidence from other dealers
in the contiguous market area, a manufacturer,  distributor or importer shall rely on evidence from
at least three other dealers in the contiguous market area  or three dealers in an economically
similar market within the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s region.
(C) A manufacturer, distributor or  importer shall use time allowances that are reason-
able and adequate for a qualified technician to make a diagnosis and perform work or  ser-
vice. The manufacturer, distributor or importer may not unreasonably deny a  written
request from a  dealer for a modification of the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s
time allowance for a specific  warranty repair, or for an additional time allowance for diag-
nostic work or repair  work on a specific vehicle that is covered by a warranty, if the dealer
includes with the request information and documentation that the manufacturer, distributor
or importer reasonably requires to assess the merits of the request.
[(C)] (D)  A dealer may not include in [ the dealer’s proposal ] a proposal described in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph :
(i) Repairs for a manufacturer’s, distributor’s  or importer’s specials, special events or promo-
tional discounts for retail customer repairs;
(ii) Parts sold at wholesale;
(iii) Routine maintenance that a retail customer warranty does not cover, such as  fluids, filters
and belts that a dealer uses in performing work other than repairs;
(iv) Nuts, bolts, fasteners and similar items that do not have an individual part number; and
(v) Vehicle reconditioning.
(c) [ The hourly rate or the amount for  parts that a dealer charges nonwarranty customers that the
dealer proposes ] A dealer’s proposal  under paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection becomes effective
30 days after the manufacturer, distributor or importer approves the hourly  rate or the amount for
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 10
parts. For purposes of this paragraph, a manufacturer, distributor  or importer approves the dealer’s
proposal if the manufacturer, distributor or  importer does not contest the proposed hourly rate or
amount for parts within 30 days after the dealer submits the proposal.
(d) If a manufacturer, distributor or importer contests a dealer’s  proposal, the manufacturer,
distributor or importer shall propose an  adjustment to the dealer’s proposal not later than 30 days
after the dealer submits the dealer’s proposal.
(e) Not more than  once per year, a manufacturer, distributor or importer may verify the
dealer’s hourly rate or the amount for parts the dealer charges nonwarranty customers  and a dealer
may propose an increase in the  manner provided in paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection in the
hourly rate or the amount the dealer charges  for parts . If the manufacturer, distributor or
importer finds that  the dealer’s hourly rate or the amount for parts has decreased, the manufacturer,
distributor or importer  may reduce the dealer’s compensation under this subsection prospectively.
If the manufacturer, distributor or importer does not  contest the dealer’s proposed increase
in the manner provided in paragraph (b)(B)  of this subsection, the increase becomes effective
as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(3) A manufacturer, distributor or importer shall include, in written  notices of vehicle recalls
to motor vehicle owners and dealers, the expected date by which necessary parts and  equipment
will be available to the dealers to correct the defect or  defects. A manufacturer, distributor or
importer shall adequately compensate a dealer for repair service the  dealer performs under the re-
call.
(4) A manufacturer, distributor or importer shall:
(a) Pay or credit a dealer for labor or parts the dealer  claims under this section within 30 days
after approving the dealer’s claim;
(b) Approve or disapprove, in the manner the manufacturer, distributor or importer specifies,
all claims that a dealer makes for labor or parts within 30 days after receiving the claim;
(c) Allow a dealer to correct  and resubmit a claim for labor or parts within 30 days after
receiving the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s disapproval;
[(c)] (d) Treat as approved any claim , or resubmission of a corrected claim,  that a manufac-
turer, distributor or importer did not approve or disapprove within 30  days after the manufacturer,
distributor or importer received the claim  or resubmission  and pay or credit the dealer for  the
claim within 60 days after receiving the claim  or resubmission ; and
[(d)] (e)  Notify the  dealer in writing of the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s grounds
for disapproving a claim.
(5) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may:
(a) Require reasonable documentation as substantiation for  a dealer’s claim under this
section;
(b) Audit a dealer’s claim under this section within one year after  the date on which the
manufacturer, distributor or importer paid the claim; and
(c) Charge back a  dealer’s claim under this section that is unsubstantiated, false or
fraudulent.
[(5)] (6) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may not:
(a) Recover all or  a portion of cost of compensating a dealer for warranty parts or service by
reducing the amount due a dealer or by imposing a separate  charge, surcharge, administrative fee
or other fee.
(b) Deny or charge back a dealer’s claim solely because a  dealer failed to comply with a specific
claim processing procedure because of a clerical or administrative error that does not affect the
legitimacy of the dealer’s claim, if the dealer resubmits the claim in compliance  with the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s claim processing procedure within 45 days after  the
manufacturer, distributor or importer initially denies or charges back the claim.
(c) Deny a dealer’s claim solely because  an owner who brought a motor vehicle to the
dealer for  a repair under warranty drove the motor vehicle for additional miles while await-
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 11
ing service or a  repair that the dealer could not complete because parts for the service or
repair were not available.
(d) Reduce a payment for a dealer’s claim solely on the basis of a national market norm
or market average.
(e) Limit or restrict the number of repairs  a motor vehicle owner may obtain from a
dealer on the basis of a national index or average of failure rates for the motor vehicle.
(7)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if a manufacturer, distrib-
utor or importer supplies a part to a dealer for the purpose of replacing the part or  making
a repair under warranty to a motor vehicle in the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s
line-make, but the manufacturer, distributor or importer does  not sell the part to the dealer,
the manufacturer, distributor or importer shall compensate the dealer  at the equivalent of
the dealer’s average percentage markup on the part as if the manufacturer, distributor  or
importer had sold the part  to the dealer at the price listed for the part in the
manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s current parts catalog.
(b) The requirement set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to  entire
engine assemblies, propulsion engine assemblies, entire transmission assemblies  or electric
batteries. If the manufacturer,  distributor or importer supplies the dealer with an assembly
or battery described in this  paragraph but does not sell the assembly or battery to the
dealer, the  manufacturer, distributor or importer shall compensate the dealer in an amount
that is equivalent to 30 percent of what the dealer would have paid for the  assembly or bat-
tery had  the manufacturer, distributor or importer sold the assembly or battery to the
dealer at the price listed in the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s current  parts
catalog.
SECTION 6.  ORS 650.161 is amended to read:
650.161. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Do not drive order” means a notice in which  a manufacturer advises owners of a vehicle
not to drive the vehicle until the owner has obtained a repair for a safety defect in the vehicle.
(b) “Stop  sale order” means a notice in which a manufacturer prohibits a franchisee from leasing
or selling at wholesale or retail a [ used] vehicle in the franchisee’s inventory because of  a federal
recall for a safety defect or a failure to comply with a federal safety standard  or a federal emissions
standard.
(c) “Valuation” means the average trade-in value shown in  an independent third-party guide for
the year, make and model of a [ used] vehicle.
(2) A manufacturer shall compensate the manufacturer’s franchisees  for all labor and parts the
manufacturer requires the franchisees to use to perform repairs on vehicles that are  subject to a
recall. The manufacturer shall compensate  franchisees in accordance with the standards and process
for compensation set forth in ORS 650.158.
(3)(a) Subject to the conditions set  forth in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, a man-
ufacturer  shall  compensate a dealer at a prorated rate of least 1.5 percent of the valuation of a
[used] vehicle that is subject to a recall during each month in which the  dealer holds the vehicle
for sale while awaiting parts or a remedy that is necessary to repair or service the vehicle.
(b) The manufacturer shall pay the compensation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) If the [ used] vehicle is subject to  a federal recall for a safety defect or a failure to comply
with a federal safety standard or a federal emissions standard;
(B) If the manufacturer issued a do not drive order or stop sale order for the [ used] vehicle;
(C) If the manufacturer has authorized the dealer to sell and service new vehicles of  the same
line-make as the [ used] vehicle that is subject to the recall;
(D) If the dealer had the [ used] vehicle in the dealer’s inventory at  the time the manufacturer
issued the do not drive order or stop sale order or  if the dealer received the [ used] vehicle as a
trade-in as part of a consumer’s purchase of [ a new ] another vehicle after the  manufacturer issued
the do not drive order or stop sale order;
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 12
(E) If a part or remedy necessary to repair or service the [ used] vehicle is not reasonably
available within 30 days after the manufacturer issued an initial recall notice; and
(F) For  a period that begins 30 days after the date on which the manufacturer issued the do not
drive order or stop sale order and that ends on the earlier of the following dates:
(i) The date on which the manufacturer makes  available to the dealer a part or remedy that is
necessary to repair the [ used] vehicle that is subject to the recall; or
(ii) The date on which the dealer sells,  trades or otherwise disposes of the [ used] vehicle that
is subject to the recall.
(c) A manufacturer may direct the manner and method by which a  dealer must demonstrate that
the dealer had a [ used] vehicle that was subject  to a recall in the dealer’s inventory as required
under paragraph (b)(D) of this subsection. The manufacturer may not require a demonstration that
is unreasonable  or unduly burdensome or require information that is unreasonably or unduly bur-
densome for the dealer to provide.
(d) This subsection does not require a manufacturer to provide  total compensation to a dealer
that exceeds the valuation of a [ used] vehicle that is subject to a recall.
(4) A claim for compensation that a franchisee  makes under subsection (2) of this section or that
a dealer makes under subsection (3) of this section is subject to  the same requirements and limita-
tions to which a claim for compensation under ORS 650.158 is subject unless:
(a) The manufacturer compensates the franchisee or  the dealer under a national program that
provides compensation for recall service or repairs that is equal to or greater than the compensation
the manufacturer would provide under subsection (3) of this section; or
(b) The manufacturer and franchisee or dealer agree to different compensation.
(5)(a) A manufacturer may not reduce  compensation that the manufacturer owes to a franchisee
by means of a  chargeback, reducing the amount the manufacturer owes a franchisee under or re-
moving a franchisee from an incentive program or any other means solely because the  franchisee
submitted a claim for or received compensation under this section.
(b) This subsection does not prohibit a  manufacturer from modifying or discontinuing an incen-
tive program or other program prospectively or from making ordinary business decisions.
(c) A franchisee may contest the amount of compensation a manufacturer  provides under this
section in accordance with the procedures set forth in ORS 650.158.
(6) A remedy that a dealer obtains under  this section is exclusive and may not be combined with
other compensation or remedies that are available under state or federal law or state or federal
compensation programs.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 650.162 is amended to read:
650.162. (1) To transfer, assign or sell the ownership or management, or any interest in  the
ownership or management, of a dealer, dealership or franchise, the dealer shall  notify the franchisor
of the decision to transfer, assign or sell. The  notice [ shall] must  include completed application
forms and related information [ generally used by ] the manufacturer, distributor or  importer  gener-
ally uses  to conduct a review of transfers, assignments or  sales and  must include  a copy of all
agreements regarding the transfer, assignment or sale.
(2) Within 60 days [ of] after  receiving notice sent under subsection (1) of this  section, a
franchisor shall send a notice by certified mail to the dealer. The notice sent under this subsection
[shall] must  specify approval or disapproval of the transfer,  assignment or sale. If the transfer, as-
signment or sale  is disapproved, the notice [ shall] must  set forth material reasons for the disap-
proval.
(3) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may not unreasonably withhold approval  of a
transfer, assignment or sale. [It is unreasonable for ] A  manufacturer, distributor or importer [ to
reject] unreasonably withholds approval for a transfer, assignment or sale if  the manufac-
turer, distributor or importer rejects  a prospective transferee, assignee or buyer who  is of good
moral character and who otherwise meets  the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s written and
reasonable standards or qualifications relating to  the prospective transferee’s, assignee’s or buyer’s:
(a) Business experience and performance; and
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 13
(b) Financial qualifications.
(4) If the  manufacturer, distributor or importer does not respond within 60 days [ of] after  re-
ceiving a notice sent under subsection (1)  of this section, the transfer, assignment or sale [ shall be
considered approved and shall take effect ] is approved and takes effect .
(5) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may exercise a  right of first refusal if the right is
included in the franchise  agreement, the transfer, assignment or sale consists of more than 50 per-
cent of the dealer’s ownership of the franchise and all of the following requirements are met:
(a) The manufacturer, distributor or importer sends a notice  by certified mail to the dealer
within 60 days  [ of] after  receiving a notice under subsection (1) of this section specifying that the
franchisor is exercising a right of first refusal.
(b) The exercise of the right of first refusal will result in  the dealer and any owner of the dealer
receiving consideration, terms  and conditions that are either the same as or better than [ those con-
tracted to ] the consideration, terms and conditions the dealer and owner  would receive under
the transfer, assignment or sale.
(c) The transferee, assignee or buyer is not any of the following:
(A) Any of the following family members of any owner of the dealer:
(i) A spouse;
(ii) A child or stepchild;
(iii) A grandchild or stepgrandchild;
(iv) The spouse of a child, stepchild, grandchild or stepgrandchild;
(v) A brother or sister or a stepbrother or stepsister; or
(vi) A parent or stepparent;
(B) A manager employed by the dealer who is otherwise qualified to be a dealer;
(C) A partnership or corporation controlled by any of the family members listed in  paragraph
(c)(A) of this subsection; or
(D) A trust established or to be established:
(i) For the purposes of allowing the transferee, assignee  or buyer to continue to qualify as such
under the manufacturer’s, distributor’s or importer’s standards; or
(ii) To provide for the succession of the franchise to qualified  designated family members or a
qualified manager in the event of the death or incapacity of the dealer.
(d) The manufacturer, distributor or importer pays the reasonable expenses, including  attorney
fees, that are incurred by the  transferee, assignee or buyer before the manufacturer, distributor or
importer exercises a right of first refusal. A manufacturer, distributor  or importer may require the
transferee, assignee or buyer to provide  an accounting of expenses incurred prior to issuing pay-
ment.
(6) A manufacturer, distributor or importer may not  exercise or threaten to exercise a
right of first refusal in bad faith.
SECTION 8.
Section 9 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 650.120 to
650.170.
SECTION 9. A franchisor shall indemnify a franchisee or former franchisee or a succes-
sor in interest to  the franchisee or former franchisee for damages, attorney fees, court ex-
penses and related  expenses that the franchisee or former franchisee reasonably incurs for
a claim:
(1) That results from a defect in the condition, a characteristic or the design  of a motor
vehicle, or in a tool or process the franchisor used in manufacturing or assembling  a motor
vehicle, or in a component,  part, accessory or equipment the franchisor assembled into or
installed in or on a motor vehicle;
(2) For injury or  damages from a service system, procedure or method that the
franchisor requires or required the franchisee or former franchisee to use, if the franchisee
or former franchisee used the  system, procedure or method properly and in accordance with
the franchisor’s training or instructions;
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 14
(3) For injury  or damages from a franchisor’s disclosure or improper use of protected
dealer data, as defined in ORS 650.123;
(4) For which the franchisee or former  franchisee would have a right of indemnity or
contribution against the franchisor under applicable law or  under a franchise, even if the
franchise expired or was terminated; or
(5) For injury or damages as  a result of the franchisee’s or former franchisee’s use of
an electronic system for managing protected dealer data,  as defined in ORS 650.123, that the
franchisor requires or required the franchisee or former franchisee to use and the use  vio-
lated a federal law or a law of this state, unless the franchisee or former franchisee, or an
agent or employee of the franchisee or former franchisee willfully or intentionally used  the
system in violation of federal law or a law of this state.
SECTION 10.
Section 9 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 650.120, 650.130,
650.132, 650.133, 650.158, 650.161 and 650.162 by sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act apply to fran-
chises that a franchisor  and franchisee enter into or renew on or after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2127 (HB 2127-B) Page 15